North Carolina statutes. Chapter 119. Gasoline and Oil Inspection and Regulation.
Article 1. Lubricating Oils.

§ 119-1.
Unlawful substitution.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to fill any order for lubricating oil, designated by a trademark or distinctive trade name for an automobile or other internal combustion engine with a spurious or substitute oil unless and until it is explained to the person giving the order that the oil offered is not the oil that he has ordered, and the purchaser shall thereupon elect to take the substitute article that is being offered to him.

History.

1927, c. 174, s. 1.

§ 119-2.
Brand or trade name of lubricating oil to be displayed.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to sell, offer for sale or delivery, or to cause or permit to be sold, offered for sale or delivery, any oil represented as lubricating oil for internal combustion engines unless there shall be firmly attached to or painted at or near the point or outlet from which said oil represented as lubricating oil for internal combustion engines is drawn or poured out for sale or delivery, a sign or label consisting of the word or words in at all times legible letters not less than one-half inch in height comprising the brand or trade name of said lubricating oil: Provided, that if any of said lubricating oil shall have no brand or trade name, the above required sign or label shall consist of the words in letters not less than three inches high, “Lubricating Oil No Brand.”

History.

1927, c. 174, s. 2.

§ 119-3.
Misrepresentation of brands for sale.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to display, at the place of sale, any sign, label or other designating mark which describes any lubricating oil for internal combustion engines not actually sold or offered for sale or delivered at the location at which the sign, label or other designating mark is displayed, or to display any label upon any container which label names or describes any lubricating oil for internal combustion engines not actually contained therein, but offered for sale or sold as such: Provided, this section shall not prevent the advertising of such products when no lubricating oil is offered for sale at such place of advertisement.

History.

1927, c. 174, s. 3.

§ 119-4.
Misdemeanor.

Any person, firm or corporation violating any of the provisions of this Article shall for each offense be deemed guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

1927, c. 174, s. 4; 1993, c. 539, s. 899; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 119-5.
Person violating or allowing employee to violate Article to forfeit $100.00.

Any person violating this Article, or any person, firm or corporation whose servant, agent or other employee violates this Article in the course of his employment shall forfeit to the manufacturer whose oil was ordered, or to the proprietor of the trademark or trade name by which the oil order was designated by the purchaser, as the case may be, one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each such offense, to be recovered by suit by the person, firm or corporation claiming the penalty against the person, firm or corporation from whom the penalty is claimed.

History.

1927, c. 174, s. 5.

§ 119-6.
Inspection duties devolve upon Commissioner of Agriculture.

The duties of inspection required by

G.S. 119-1

through 119-5 shall be performed by the Commissioner of Agriculture.

History.

1933, c. 214, s. 9; 1949, c. 1167.